Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1201
Policy.

It is declared to be the policy of this state (1) to establish a minimum wage for all workers at levels consistent with their health, efficiency and general well-being, and (2) to safeguard existing minimum wage compensation standards which are adequate to maintain the health, efficiency and general well-being of workers against the unfair competition of wage and hours standards which do not provide adequate standards of living.

Laws 1967, c. 285, § 1, p. 773.

Parties may not waive the protections afforded under the Wage and Hour Act. Mays v. Midnite Dreams, 300 Neb. 485, 915 N.W.2d 71 (2018).